test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nensg_ade_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - nensgade: # sg ade -- inte kontrollerad 
    laskiainen+N+Sg+Ade: laskiaiselä
    tuliainen+N+Sg+Ade: tuliaisela
    tuliainen+N+Sg+Ade: tuliaiselä
    loppiainen+N+Sg+Ade: loppiaiselä
    lantalainen+N+Sg+Ade: lantalaisela
    lantalainen+N+Sg+Ade: lantalaiselä
    pistianen+N+Sg+Ade: pistiasela
    viranomhainen+N+Sg+Ade: viranomaisela
    viranomhainen+N+Sg+Ade: viranomhaisela
    helluntaiainen+N+Sg+Ade: helluntaiaisela
    nahkiainen+N+Sg+Ade: nahkiaisela
    paukkiainen+N+Sg+Ade: paukkiaisela
    laskiainen+N+Sg+Ade: laskiaisela
    laskiainen+N+Sg+Ade: laskiaiselä
    hulliainen+N+Sg+Ade: hulliaisela
    tuliainen+N+Sg+Ade: tuliaisela
    tuliainen+N+Sg+Ade: tuliaiselä
    tuhniainen+N+Sg+Ade: tuhniaisela
    painiainen+N+Sg+Ade: painiaisela
    ponniainen+N+Sg+Ade: ponniaisela
    tolpiainen+N+Sg+Ade: tolpiaisela
    ampiainen+N+Sg+Ade: ampiaisela
    kompiainen+N+Sg+Ade: kompiaisela
    varpiainen+N+Sg+Ade: varpiaisela
    urpiainen+N+Sg+Ade: urpiaisela
    punapääurpiainen+N+Sg+Ade: punapääurpiaisela
    kiuriainen+N+Sg+Ade: kiuriaisela
    vaaksiainen+N+Sg+Ade: vaaksiaisela
    orivaaksiainen+N+Sg+Ade: orivaaksiaisela
    vaapsiainen+N+Sg+Ade: vaapsiaisela
    kastiainen+N+Sg+Ade: kastiaisela
    polttiainen+N+Sg+Ade: polttiaisela
    prutiainen+N+Sg+Ade: prutiaisela
    painajainen+N+Sg+Ade: painajaisela
    kieltakainen+N+Sg+Ade: kieltakaisela
    pienokainen+N+Sg+Ade: pienokaisela
    keijukainen+N+Sg+Ade: keijukaisela
    pulmukainen+N+Sg+Ade: pulmukaisela
    ainukainen+N+Sg+Ade: ainukaisela
    saarukainen+N+Sg+Ade: saarukaisela
    nuorukainen+N+Sg+Ade: nuorukaisela
    lapsukainen+N+Sg+Ade: lapsukaisela
    länsilainen+N+Sg+Ade: länsilaisela
    malmikenttälainen+N+Sg+Ade: malmikenttälaisela
    ulkomaalainen+N+Sg+Ade: ulkomaalaisela
    karjalainen+N+Sg+Ade: karjalaisela
    norjalainen+N+Sg+Ade: norjalaisela
    ameriikalainen+N+Sg+Ade: ameriikalaisela
    franskalainen+N+Sg+Ade: franskalaisela
    tanskalainen+N+Sg+Ade: tanskalaisela
    muukalainen+N+Sg+Ade: muukalaisela
    taalalainen+N+Sg+Ade: taalalaisela
    talalainen+N+Sg+Ade: talalaisela
    puolalainen+N+Sg+Ade: puolalaisela
    kalmalainen+N+Sg+Ade: kalmalaisela
    suomalainen+N+Sg+Ade: suomalaisela
    ruottinsuomalainen+N+Sg+Ade: ruottinsuomalaisela
    vesisuomalainen+N+Sg+Ade: vesisuomalaisela
    suomensuomalainen+N+Sg+Ade: suomensuomalaisela
    manalainen+N+Sg+Ade: manalaisela
    ohtanalainen+N+Sg+Ade: ohtanalaisela
    lauuanalainen+N+Sg+Ade: lauuanalaisela
    veenalainen+N+Sg+Ade: veenalaisela
    kinalainen+N+Sg+Ade: kinalaisela
    latinalainen+N+Sg+Ade: latinalaisela
    kirunalainen+N+Sg+Ade: kirunalaisela
    lappalainen+N+Sg+Ade: lappalaisela
    kotalappalainen+N+Sg+Ade: kotalappalaisela
    outalappalainen+N+Sg+Ade: outalappalaisela
    tunturilappalainen+N+Sg+Ade: tunturilappalaisela
    kerjulappalainen+N+Sg+Ade: kerjulappalaisela
    saksalainen+N+Sg+Ade: saksalaisela
    kansalainen+N+Sg+Ade: kansalaisela
    lantalainen+N+Sg+Ade: lantalaisela
    lantalainen+N+Sg+Ade: lantalaiselä
    kulkulantalainen+N+Sg+Ade: kulkulantalaisela
    pithäänrantalainen+N+Sg+Ade: pithäänrantalaisela
    mustalainen+N+Sg+Ade: mustalaisela
    ruottalainen+N+Sg+Ade: ruottalaisela
    kovaruottalainen+N+Sg+Ade: kovaruottalaisela
    ummikkoruottalainen+N+Sg+Ade: ummikkoruottalaisela
    juutalainen+N+Sg+Ade: juutalaisela
    jyväjuutalainen+N+Sg+Ade: jyväjuutalaisela
    ylipuolelainen+N+Sg+Ade: ylipuolelaisela
    saamelainen+N+Sg+Ade: saamelaisela
    turkkilainen+N+Sg+Ade: turkkilaisela
    tukkilainen+N+Sg+Ade: tukkilaisela
    katolilainen+N+Sg+Ade: katolilaisela
    puolilainen+N+Sg+Ade: puolilaisela
    suomenpuolilainen+N+Sg+Ade: suomenpuolilaisela
    kummilainen+N+Sg+Ade: kummilaisela
    korppilainen+N+Sg+Ade: korppilaisela
    unkarilainen+N+Sg+Ade: unkarilaisela
    tunturilainen+N+Sg+Ade: tunturilaisela
    englantilainen+N+Sg+Ade: englantilaisela
    mustilainen+N+Sg+Ade: mustilaisela
    järvilainen+N+Sg+Ade: järvilaisela
    kaikenlainen+N+Sg+Ade: kaikenlaisela
    monenlainen+N+Sg+Ade: monenlaisela
    paholainen+N+Sg+Ade: paholaisela
    länsilestaatiolainen+N+Sg+Ade: länsilestaatiolaisela
    lahkolainen+N+Sg+Ade: lahkolaisela
    ulkolainen+N+Sg+Ade: ulkolaisela
    toisenuskolainen+N+Sg+Ade: toisenuskolaisela
    tienoolainen+N+Sg+Ade: tienoolaisela
    vierolainen+N+Sg+Ade: vierolaisela
    torniolaaksolainen+N+Sg+Ade: torniolaaksolaisela
    vetolainen+N+Sg+Ade: vetolaisela
    suantolainen+N+Sg+Ade: suantolaisela
    koirankuontolainen+N+Sg+Ade: koirankuontolaisela
    lintukotolainen+N+Sg+Ade: lintukotolaisela
    siirtolainen+N+Sg+Ade: siirtolaisela
    liittolainen+N+Sg+Ade: liittolaisela
    paikkulainen+N+Sg+Ade: paikkulaisela
    kulkulainen+N+Sg+Ade: kulkulaisela
    suokulainen+N+Sg+Ade: suokulaisela
    karkulainen+N+Sg+Ade: karkulaisela
    nukulainen+N+Sg+Ade: nukulaisela
    sukulainen+N+Sg+Ade: sukulaisela
    verisukulainen+N+Sg+Ade: verisukulaisela
    koululainen+N+Sg+Ade: koululaisela
    kainulainen+N+Sg+Ade: kainulaisela
    ylikainulainen+N+Sg+Ade: ylikainulaisela
    apulainen+N+Sg+Ade: apulaisela
    kumpulainen+N+Sg+Ade: kumpulaisela
    tulimainen+N+Sg+Ade: tulimaisela
    viranomhainen+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Ade: viranomaisela
    nainen+N+Sg+Ade: naisela
    valtanainen+N+Sg+Ade: valtanaisela
    kaksinainen+N+Sg+Ade: kaksinaisela
    viinipunainen+N+Sg+Ade: viinipunaisela
    turkinpunainen+N+Sg+Ade: turkinpunaisela
    kottarainen+N+Sg+Ade: kottaraisela
    kierainen+N+Sg+Ade: kieraisela
    piirainen+N+Sg+Ade: piiraisela
    kaakurainen+N+Sg+Ade: kaakuraisela
    kiekurainen+N+Sg+Ade: kiekuraisela
    tuppurainen+N+Sg+Ade: tuppuraisela
    kisurainen+N+Sg+Ade: kisuraisela
    pulluainen+N+Sg+Ade: pulluaisela
    munuainen+N+Sg+Ade: munuaisela
    keijavainen+N+Sg+Ade: keijavaisela
    pellavainen+N+Sg+Ade: pellavaisela
    matelevainen+N+Sg+Ade: matelevaisela
    kuolevainen+N+Sg+Ade: kuolevaisela
    uskovainen+N+Sg+Ade: uskovaisela
    kiiluvainen+N+Sg+Ade: kiiluvaisela
    pulluvainen+N+Sg+Ade: pulluvaisela
    outopuhheinen+N+Sg+Ade: outopuhheisela
    piinen+N+Sg+Ade: piiselä
    varphaalinen+N+Sg+Ade: varphaalisela
    kirjalinen+N+Sg+Ade: kirjalisela
    illalinen+N+Sg+Ade: illalisela
    liikajumalinen+N+Sg+Ade: liikajumalisela
    veljelinen+N+Sg+Ade: veljeliselä
    järjelinen+N+Sg+Ade: järjeliselä
    lapselinen+N+Sg+Ade: lapselisela
    sylilinen+N+Sg+Ade: syliliselä
    kaapilinen+N+Sg+Ade: kaapilisela
    laarilinen+N+Sg+Ade: laarilisela
    plakkarilinen+N+Sg+Ade: plakkarilisela
    perilinen+N+Sg+Ade: periliselä
    loovallinen+N+Sg+Ade: loovallisela
    pläkkitoopillinen+N+Sg+Ade: pläkkitoopillisela
    lasillinen+N+Sg+Ade: lasillisela
    maijollinen+N+Sg+Ade: maijollisela
    lohullinen+N+Sg+Ade: lohullisela
    laukullinen+N+Sg+Ade: laukullisela
    viholinen+N+Sg+Ade: viholisela
    lapiolinen+N+Sg+Ade: lapiolisela
    palkolinen+N+Sg+Ade: palkolisela
    vuosipalkolinen+N+Sg+Ade: vuosipalkolisela
    ehtoolinen+N+Sg+Ade: ehtoolisela
    otolinen+N+Sg+Ade: otolisela
    puolinen+N+Sg+Ade: puolisela
    pintapuolinen+N+Sg+Ade: pintapuolisela
    paikulinen+N+Sg+Ade: paikulisela
    kiululinen+N+Sg+Ade: kiululisela
    pannulinen+N+Sg+Ade: pannulisela
    veripannulinen+N+Sg+Ade: veripannulisela
    vesipannulinen+N+Sg+Ade: vesipannulisela
    avulinen+N+Sg+Ade: avulisela
    ijälinen+N+Sg+Ade: ijäliselä
    täsmälinen+N+Sg+Ade: täsmäliselä
    kesälinen+N+Sg+Ade: kesäliselä
    pauhaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: pauhaamisela
    leikkaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: leikkaamisela
    pellolleikkaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: pellolleikkaamisela
    pellonleikkaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: pellonleikkaamisela
    friskaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: friskaamisela
    fjäskaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: fjäskaamisela
    maampruukaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: maampruukaamisela
    masiinaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: masiinaamisela
    houraaminen+N+Sg+Ade: houraamisela
    lapsensaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: lapsensaamisela
    kousaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: kousaamisela
    multaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: multaamisela
    lastaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: lastaamisela
    palvaaminen+N+Sg+Ade: palvaamisela
    jakaminen+N+Sg+Ade: jakamisela
    kuuroaminen+N+Sg+Ade: kuuroamisela
    tappaminen+N+Sg+Ade: tappamisela
    hunteeraminen+N+Sg+Ade: hunteeramisela
    nostaminen+N+Sg+Ade: nostamisela
    potunottaminen+N+Sg+Ade: potunottamisela
    oottaminen+N+Sg+Ade: oottamisela
    lehmäjjuottaminen+N+Sg+Ade: lehmäjjuottamisela
    liikuttaminen+N+Sg+Ade: liikuttamisela
    lehmähheruttaminen+N+Sg+Ade: lehmähheruttamisela
    kasuaminen+N+Sg+Ade: kasuamisela
    vieminen+N+Sg+Ade: viemiselä
    tekeminen+N+Sg+Ade: tekemiselä
    laskeminen+N+Sg+Ade: laskemisela
    lukeminen+N+Sg+Ade: lukemisela
    väheneminen+N+Sg+Ade: vähenemiselä
    lähteminen+N+Sg+Ade: lähtemiselä
    karhitteminen+N+Sg+Ade: karhittemisela
    merkitteminen+N+Sg+Ade: merkittemiselä
    kuokkiminen+N+Sg+Ade: kuokkimisela
    lehmärruokkiminen+N+Sg+Ade: lehmärruokkimisela
    onkiminen+N+Sg+Ade: onkimisela
    rykiminen+N+Sg+Ade: rykimiselä
    koiniminen+N+Sg+Ade: koinimisela
    häiriminen+N+Sg+Ade: häirimiselä
    lahominen+N+Sg+Ade: lahomisela
    velkominen+N+Sg+Ade: velkomisela
    leipominen+N+Sg+Ade: leipomisela
    kutominen+N+Sg+Ade: kutomisela
    pahonpuhuminen+N+Sg+Ade: pahonpuhumisela
    kraakuminen+N+Sg+Ade: kraakumisela
    haukkuminen+N+Sg+Ade: haukkumisela
    nukkuminen+N+Sg+Ade: nukkumisela
    ammuminen+N+Sg+Ade: ammumisela
    noituminen+N+Sg+Ade: noitumisela
    lakastuminen+N+Sg+Ade: lakastumisela
    muuttuminen+N+Sg+Ade: muuttumisela
    vähentyminen+N+Sg+Ade: vähentymiselä
    siirtyminen+N+Sg+Ade: siirtymiselä
    eläminen+N+Sg+Ade: elämiselä
    lypsäminen+N+Sg+Ade: lypsämiselä
    vähentäminen+N+Sg+Ade: vähentämiselä
    verentypheyttäminen+N+Sg+Ade: verentypheyttämiselä
    pyytäminen+N+Sg+Ade: pyytämiselä
    potukkylväminen+N+Sg+Ade: potukkylvämiselä
    kaurankylväminen+N+Sg+Ade: kaurankylvämiselä
    värkkääminen+N+Sg+Ade: värkkäämiselä
    tryskääminen+N+Sg+Ade: tryskäämiselä
    räknääminen+N+Sg+Ade: räknäämiselä
    jyrrääminen+N+Sg+Ade: jyrräämiselä
    kryssääminen+N+Sg+Ade: kryssäämiselä
    valjusỳäminen+N+Sg+Ade: valjusỳämiselä
    kylpöminen+N+Sg+Ade: kylpömiselä
    kyntöminen+N+Sg+Ade: kyntömiselä
    kallioinen+N+Sg+Ade: kallioisela
    tattarinen+N+Sg+Ade: tattarisela
    voiffärinen+N+Sg+Ade: voiffäriselä
    tyttärinen+N+Sg+Ade: tyttäriselä
    pikkutyttärinen+N+Sg+Ade: pikkutyttäriselä
    yheksinen+N+Sg+Ade: yheksiselä
    luinen+N+Sg+Ade: luisela
    omituinen+N+Sg+Ade: omituisela
    potuinen+N+Sg+Ade: potuisela
    kiekiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: kiekiäiselä
    äykiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: äykiäiselä
    eeliäinen+N+Sg+Ade: eeliäiselä
    viheliäinen+N+Sg+Ade: viheliäiselä
    termiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: termiäiselä
    törmiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: törmiäiselä
    myriäinen+N+Sg+Ade: myriäiselä
    myyriäinen+N+Sg+Ade: myyriäiselä
    möyriäinen+N+Sg+Ade: möyriäiselä
    pääsiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: pääsiäiselä
    lähtiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: lähtiäiselä
    tiitiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: tiitiäiselä
    ästiitiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: ästiitiäiselä
    lentiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: lentiäiselä
    lentiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: lentiäiselä
    vesihyöntiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: vesihyöntiäiselä
    hiertiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: hiertiäiselä
    mettiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: mettiäiselä
    paskaröttiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: paskaröttiäiselä
    hytiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: hytiäiselä
    vyötiäinen+N+Sg+Ade: vyötiäiselä
    ymmyrkäinen+N+Sg+Ade: ymmyrkäiselä
    länsiläinen+N+Sg+Ade: länsiläiselä
    malmikenttäläinen+N+Sg+Ade: malmikenttäläiselä
    imeläinen+N+Sg+Ade: imeläiselä
    mehiläinen+N+Sg+Ade: mehiläiselä
    helsinkiläinen+N+Sg+Ade: helsinkiläiselä
    kemiläinen+N+Sg+Ade: kemiläiselä
    meriläinen+N+Sg+Ade: meriläiselä
    lähettiläinen+N+Sg+Ade: lähettiläiselä
    mahomettiläinen+N+Sg+Ade: mahomettiläiselä
    jättiläinen+N+Sg+Ade: jättiläiselä
    järviläinen+N+Sg+Ade: järviläiselä
    puoskakenkäläinen+N+Sg+Ade: puoskakenkäläiselä
    kyläläinen+N+Sg+Ade: kyläläiselä
    omakyläläinen+N+Sg+Ade: omakyläläiselä
